Virginia statutes. Title 3.2. Agriculture, Animal Care, and Food.
Article 2. Inspection, Slaughter, and Official Marks.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

8B M.J. Food, § 3; 9A M.J. Health and Sanitation, § 1.

§ 3.2-5406.
Meat inspection regulations.

The Commissioner may adopt: (i) by reference any regulation under the federal acts as it pertains to this chapter, amending it as necessary for intrastate applicability; and (ii) any regulation containing provisions no less stringent than those contained in federal regulation. Such regulation adopted by the Commissioner shall be effective upon filing with the Registrar of Regulations, who shall publish the regulation as a final regulation in the Virginia Register of Regulations.The regulation shall contain a preamble stating that the Board will receive, consider, and respond to petitions by any interested person at any time with respect to reconsideration or revision of such regulation.

The Board, after giving notice in the Virginia Register of Regulations, may reconsider and revise the regulation adopted by the Commissioner. Such revised regulation shall be effective upon filing with the Registrar of Regulations, who shall publish the regulation as a final regulation in the Virginia Register of Regulations. Neither the provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) nor public participation guidelines adopted pursuant thereto shall apply to the adoption, reconsideration, or revision of any regulation adopted pursuant to this section.

History.

1991, c. 344, § 3.1-884.21:1; 2008, c. 860.

Cross references.

As to exemptions, generally, from the Administrative Process Act, see §

2.2-4002

.

§ 3.2-5407.
Prohibitions in general.

No person shall, with respect to any livestock or poultry or any livestock products or poultry products:

Slaughter any such animals or prepare any such articles that are capable of use as human food, at any establishment preparing such articles solely for intrastate commerce, except in compliance with the requirements of this chapter;

Sell, transport, offer for sale or transportation, or receive for transportation, in intrastate commerce, any such articles that: (i) are capable of use as human food, and (ii) are adulterated or misbranded at the time of such sale, transportation, offer for sale or transportation, or receipt for transportation; or any articles required to be inspected under this chapter unless they have been so inspected and passed; or

Perform any act, with respect to any articles that are capable of use as human food, while they are being transported in intrastate commerce or held for sale after such transportation, that is intended to cause or has the effect of causing such articles to be adulterated or misbranded.

No person shall sell, transport, offer for sale or transportation, or receive for transportation, in intrastate commerce, or from an official establishment, any slaughtered poultry from which the blood, feathers, feet, head, or viscera have not been removed in accordance with regulations promulgated by the Board.

No person shall violate any provision of the regulations of the Board under subdivisions 7, 8, 9, or 10 of §

3.2-5404

or orders of the Commissioner under subdivisions A 3 and A 4 of §

3.2-5405

.

History.

1970, c. 290, § 3.1-884.22; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5408.
Prohibitions against unauthorized use of any official marks.

No brand manufacturer, printer, or other person shall cast, print, lithograph, or otherwise make any device containing any official mark or simulation thereof, or any label bearing any such mark or simulation, or any form of official certificate or simulation thereof, except as authorized by the Commissioner.

No person shall:

Forge any official device, mark, or certificate;

Without authorization from the Commissioner, use any official device, mark, or certificate, or simulation thereof, or alter, detach, deface, or destroy any official device, mark, or certificate;

Contrary to the regulations prescribed by the Board, fail to use, or to detach, deface, or destroy any official device, mark, or certificate;

Knowingly possess, without promptly notifying the Commissioner any official device or any counterfeit, simulated, forged, or improperly altered official certificate or any device or label or any carcass of any animal (including poultry), or part or product thereof, bearing any counterfeit, simulated, forged, or improperly altered official mark;

Knowingly make any false statement in any shipper’s certificate or other nonofficial or official certificate provided for in the regulations prescribed by the Board; or

Knowingly represent that any article has been inspected and passed, or exempted, under this article when, in fact, it has, respectively, not been so inspected and passed, or exempted.

History.

1970, c. 290, § 3.1-884.23; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5409.
Prohibition against intrastate distribution of equine, livestock and poultry products.

No person shall sell, transport, offer for sale or transportation, or receive for transportation, in intrastate commerce, any carcasses of horses, mules, or other equines or parts of such carcasses, or the meat or meat food products thereof, unless they are plainly and conspicuously marked or labeled or otherwise identified as required by regulations prescribed by the Board to show the kinds of animals from which they were derived.

No person shall buy, sell, transport, or offer for sale or transportation, or receive for transportation, in intrastate commerce, any livestock products or poultry products that are not intended for use as human food unless they are denatured or otherwise identified as required by the regulations of the Board or are naturally inedible by humans.

No person engaged in the business of buying, selling, or transporting in intrastate commerce, dead, dying, disabled, or diseased animals, or any parts of the carcasses of any animals that died otherwise than by slaughter, shall buy, sell, transport, offer for sale or transportation, or receive for transportation, in such commerce, any dead, dying, disabled, or diseased livestock or poultry or the products of any such animals that died otherwise than by slaughter, unless such transaction or transportation, is made in accordance with such regulations as the Board may prescribe to assure that such animals, or the unwholesome parts or products thereof, will be prevented from being used for human food purposes.

History.

1970, c. 290, § 3.1-884.24; 2008, c. 860.